Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 15. Expungement Of Records Of Convictions

§ 7-13-1501.
Petition for expungement of records of conviction of certain misdemeanors; filing fee; notice; objections; hearing; definitions; exceptions.

A person who has pled guilty or nolo contendere to or been convicted of a misdemeanor may petition the convicting court for an expungement of the records of conviction, subject to the following limitations:

At least five (5) years have passed for nonstatus offenses and at least one (1) year has passed for status offenses as defined by W.S. 7-1-107(b)(iii) since the expiration of the terms of sentence imposed by the court, including any periods of probation or the completion of any program ordered by the court;

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 164, § 2.

The misdemeanor or misdemeanors for which the person is seeking expungement shall not have involved the use or attempted use of a firearm;

A health care provider who has pled guilty or nolo contendere to or has been convicted of an offense punishable under W.S.

6-2-313

which was committed against a patient under the care of the health care provider shall not be eligible for an expungement of the records of conviction.

A petition filed under this section shall be verified by the petitioner and served upon the prosecuting attorney and the division of criminal investigation. The filing fee for each petition filed under this section shall be one hundred dollars ($100.00) and shall be deposited in accordance with W.S.

5-9-144

.

The prosecuting attorney shall serve notice of the petition for expungement by certified mail, return receipt requested, to any identifiable victims of the misdemeanors at their last known addresses of record on file with the prosecuting attorney. The notices shall include a copy of the petition and statutes applicable to the petition. In the event that there are no identifiable victims, or that there is at least one (1) identifiable victim and the prosecuting attorney has no address of record on file or the notice sent was returned or is otherwise undeliverable, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the court and shall be deemed to have complied with the provisions of this subsection.

The court in its discretion may request a written report by the division of criminal investigation concerning the criminal history of the petitioner.

The prosecuting attorney shall review the petition and shall file with the court an objection or recommendation, if any, to the petition within thirty (30) days after service of the notice by the petitioner upon the prosecuting attorney. If the prosecuting attorney or an identifiable victim submits a written objection to the court concerning the petition within thirty (30) days after service of the notice by the petitioner upon the prosecuting attorney, or if the petitioner objects to the criminal history report of the division of criminal investigation if requested by the court, the court shall set a date for a hearing and notify the prosecuting attorney, the identifiable victims who have submitted written objections to the petition, the division of criminal investigation and the petitioner of the date set for the hearing. Any person who has relevant information about the petitioner may testify at the hearing.

If no objection is filed to the petition within thirty (30) days after service of the notice by the petitioner upon the prosecuting attorney, the court may summarily enter an order if the court finds that the petitioner is otherwise eligible for relief under this section. No order granting expungement shall be issued prior to the expiration of thirty (30) days after service was made to the prosecuting attorney.

If the court finds that the petitioner is eligible for relief under this section and that the petitioner does not represent a substantial danger to himself, any identifiable victim or society, it shall issue an order granting expungement of the applicable records. The court shall also place the court files under seal, available for inspection only by order of that court. The court shall transmit a certified copy of the order to the division of criminal investigation.

The state, through the prosecuting attorney, may appeal any order of expungement issued by any court under this section.

Notwithstanding W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, the division of criminal investigation and its employees and any prosecuting attorney are immune from liability, either as an agency or individually, for any actions, inactions or omissions by the agency or any employee thereof, pursuant to this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a person who has previously received an expungement of records of conviction under this section to seek a second or subsequent expungement of records of conviction under this section.

As used in this section:

“Expungement” means as defined in W.S. 7-13-1401(j)(i);

“Misdemeanor” means as defined by W.S.

6-10-101

;

“Record” means as defined in W.S. 7-13-1401(j)(ii);

“Health care provider” means an individual who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted by the laws of this state to provide care, treatment, services or procedures to maintain, diagnose or otherwise treat a patient’s physical or mental condition.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 69, § 1; 2009, ch. 67, § 1; 2014 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 164, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 80, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2009 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a), inserted “under W.S. 6-2-501(a), (b) or (e), 6-2-504(a) or

6-6-102

, or those same” and deleted “for the purposes of restoring any firearm rights lost,” preceding “subject to”, in (a)(i), substituted “five (5) years have” for “one (1) year has”, in (a)(ii), “for which an expungement is sought under this section” for “arising out of the same occurrence or related course of events” and “under W.S. 6-2-501(a), (b) or (e), 6-2-504(a) or

6-6-102

” for “for which firearm rights have been lost”, and in (k), deleted the former first and second sentences which related to an expungement granted for the purposes of restoring firearm rights.

Laws 2009, ch. 67, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 26, 2009.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “or (e)” and inserted “6-2-510(a), 6-2-511(a)” in the introductory paragraph of (a) and in (a)(ii).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), deleted the phrase which read “under
W.S. 6-2-501(a) or (b), 6-2-504(a), 6-2-510(a), 6-2-511(a) or

6-6-102

, or those same misdemeanors arising out of the same occurrence or related course of events” in the introductory language; in (a)(i), inserted “for nonstatus offenses and at least one (1) year has passed for status offenses as defined by
W.S. 7-1-107(b)(iii).”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(iv); added (m)(iv); and made a stylistic change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective date. —

Laws 2004, ch. 69, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

Relation to other laws. —

Congress intended the terms “expunge” and “set aside,” as used in 18 U.S.C.S. § 921(a)(33)(B)(ii), to require that a state procedure completely remove the effects of a prior misdemeanor conviction; this section undoubtedly failed to meet that standard, and accordingly district court correctly dismissed Wyoming's suit against the federal ATF, in which Wyoming sought review of the ATF's finding that this section would not restore federal firearm rights because it did not satisfy the federal definition of expunge or set aside.
Wyoming ex rel. Crank v. United States, 539 F.3d 1236, 2008 U.S. App. LEXIS 18224 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2008).

§ 7-13-1502.
Petition for expungement of records of conviction of certain felonies; filing fee; notice; objections; hearing; definitions; restoration of rights.

A person convicted of a felony or felonies subject to expungement under this section arising out of the same occurrence or related course of events, may petition the convicting court for an expungement of the records of conviction, subject to the following limitations:

At least ten (10) years have passed since:

The expiration of the terms of sentence imposed by the court, including any periods of probation;

The completion of any program ordered by the court; and

Any restitution ordered by the court has been paid in full.

Other than convictions for which an expungement is sought under this section, the petitioner has not previously pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been convicted of a felony;

The felony or felonies for which the person is seeking expungement shall not have involved the use or attempted use of a firearm unless the felony or felonies are offenses punishable under title 23 of Wyoming statutes;

Felonies subject to expungement under this section shall not include:

Violent felonies as defined in W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii);

Any offense punishable under W.S. 6-2-106(b);

Any offense punishable under W.S.

6-2-108

;

Any offense punishable under W.S.

6-2-301

through

6-2-320

;

Any offense punishable under W.S. 6-2-501(f) as in effect prior to July 1, 2014 and any offense punishable under W.S. 6-2-511(b)(iii);

Any offense punishable under W.S.

6-2-503

;

Any offense punishable under W.S. 6-2-508(b);

and (J) Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 124, § 2.

(K)

Any offense punishable under W.S. 6-4-303(b)(i) through (iii);

(M)

Any offense punishable under W.S. 6-4-402(b);

(N)

Any offense punishable under W.S.

6-4-405

;

(O)

Any offense punishable under W.S.

6-5-102

;

(P)

Any offense punishable under W.S. 6-5-204(c);

(Q)

Any offense punishable under W.S.

6-5-206

or

6-5-207

;

(R)

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 124, §
2.

(S)

Any offense punishable under W.S.

6-8-101

and

6-8-102

; or

(T)

Any offense subject to registration under W.S. 7-19-302(g) through (j);

(U) and (W)

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 124, §
2.

A petition filed under this section shall be verified by the petitioner and served upon the prosecuting attorney and the division of criminal investigation. The filing fee for each petition filed under this section shall be three hundred dollars ($300.00) and shall be deposited in accordance with W.S.

5-3-205

.

The prosecuting attorney shall, within thirty (30) days of service upon him, serve notice of the petition for expungement by certified mail, return receipt requested, to any identifiable victims of the nonviolent felonies at their last known addresses of record on file with the prosecuting attorney. The notices shall include a copy of the petition and statutes applicable to the petition. In the event that there are no identifiable victims, or that there is at least one (1) identifiable victim and the prosecuting attorney has no address of record on file or the notice sent was returned or is otherwise undeliverable, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the court and shall be deemed to have complied with the provisions of this subsection.

The court in its discretion may request a written report by the division of criminal investigation concerning the criminal history of the petitioner.

The prosecuting attorney shall review the petition and shall file with the court an objection or recommendation, if any, to the petition within ninety (90) days after service of the notice by the petitioner upon the prosecuting attorney. If the prosecuting attorney or an identifiable victim submits a written objection to the court concerning the petition within ninety (90) days after service of the notice by the petitioner upon the prosecuting attorney, or if the petitioner objects to the criminal history report of the division of criminal investigation if requested by the court, the court shall set a date for a hearing and notify the prosecuting attorney, the identifiable victims who have submitted written objections to the petition, the division of criminal investigation and the petitioner of the date set for the hearing. Any person who has relevant information about the petitioner may testify at the hearing.

If no objection is filed to the petition within ninety (90) days after service of the notice by the petitioner upon the prosecuting attorney, the court may summarily enter an order if the court finds that the petitioner is otherwise eligible for relief under this section. No order granting expungement shall be issued prior to the expiration of ninety (90) days after service was made to the prosecuting attorney.

If the court finds that the petitioner is eligible for relief under this section and that the petitioner does not represent a substantial danger to himself, any identifiable victim or society, it shall issue an order granting expungement of the applicable records. The court shall also place the court files under seal, available for inspection only by order of that court. The court shall transmit a certified copy of the order to the division of criminal investigation.

The state, through the prosecuting attorney, may appeal any order of expungement issued by any court under this section.

Notwithstanding W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, the division of criminal investigation and its employees and any prosecuting attorney are immune from liability, either as an agency or individually, for any actions, inactions or omissions by the agency or any employee thereof, pursuant to this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a person who has previously received an expungement of records of conviction under this section to seek a second or subsequent expungement of records of conviction under this section.

An expungement of records pursuant to this section shall restore any rights removed as a result of the conviction for which the expungement has been granted.

As used in this section:

“Expungement” means as defined in W.S. 7-13-1401(j)(i);

“Record” means as defined in W.S. 7-13-1401(j)(ii).

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 69, § 1; 2014 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2014 ch. 124, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, by ch 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2014, added “as in effect prior to July 1, 2014 and any offense punishable under W.S. 6-2-511(b)(iii)” in (a)(iv)(E).

The second 2014 amendment, by ch 124 §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2014,
in (a)(iii), added “unless the felony or felonies are offenses punishable under title 23 of Wyoming statutes”; in (a)(iv)(P), substituted “6-5-204(c)” for “6-5-204(b) or (c)”; and in (a)(iv)(S), substituted “and

6-8-102

; or” for “through

6-8-103

”; repealed former (a)(iv)(H) which read: “Any offense punishable under
W.S.

6-3-111

”; repealed former (a)(iv)(J) which read: “Any offense punishable under
W.S.

6-4-103

”; repealed former (a)(iv)(R) which read: “Any offense punishable under
W.S.

6-5-301

”; repealed former (a)(iv)(U) which read: “Any offense punishable as a felony under
W.S.

31-5-233

; or”; and repealed former (a)(iv)(W) which read: “Any offense punishable as a felony under
W.S. 35-7-1031(a) through (c) or

35-7-1036

.”

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 69, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (

l

) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.